Utah statutes.
75-5-426.   Enlargement or limitation of powers of conservator.
Subject to the restrictions of Subsection 75-5-408(1)(d), the court may confer
on a conservator at the time of appointment or later, in addition to the
powers conferred on him by Sections 75-5-424 and 75-5-425, any power which the
court itself could exercise under Subsections 75-5-408(1)(b) and
75-5-408(1)(c).  The court may, at the time of appointment or later, limit the
powers of a conservator otherwise conferred by Sections 75-5-424 and 75-5-425,
or previously conferred by the court, and may at any time relieve him of any
limitation.  If the court limits any power conferred on the conservator by
Section 75-5-424 or 75-5-425, the limitation shall be endorsed upon his
letters of appointment.
